Washington statutes.
RCW 17.26.007

Findings—Application to appropriations.

This section applies to appropriations made to the department of agriculture specifically for the removal or control of spartina or purple loosestrife or both plants. The legislature finds that: The presence of spartina or purple loosestrife on private lands threatens wildlife habitat and provides a source of renewed infestation for public lands; and effective eradication or control of spartina or purple loosestrife requires concerted efforts on both public and private lands to protect public resources. The department of agriculture may grant funds to other state agencies, local governments, and nonprofit corporations for eradication or control purposes and may use those moneys itself. The department of agriculture may match private funds for eradication or control programs on private property on a fifty-fifty matching basis. The accounting and supervision of the funds at the local level shall be conducted by the department of agriculture.

[ 1995 c 255 s 11.]